Hawaii statutes.
§302A-626 Salary increases; annual,
longevity. (a) Teachers and educational officers who have completed a
year's satisfactory service and who have complied with the other requirements
of sections 302A-602 to 302A-639, and 302A-701, shall be entitled to an annual
increment.

(b) Teachers and educational officers who have
served satisfactorily for three years in their maximum increment step or in any
longevity step and who have complied with the other requirements of sections
302A-602 to 302A-639, and 302A-701, shall receive longevity step increases;
provided that the board may grant principals and vice-principals longevity step
increases more frequently than once every three years pursuant to section
302A-625. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 256, §4; am L 2012, c 133, §12]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next